Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.460

Juvenile rehabilitation programs—Administration.

The secretary or the secretary's designee shall manage and administer the department's juvenile rehabilitation responsibilities, including but not limited to the operation of all state institutions or facilities used for juvenile rehabilitation.

The secretary or the secretary's designee shall:

(1) Prepare a biennial budget request sufficient to meet the confinement and rehabilitative needs of the juvenile rehabilitation program, as forecast by the office of financial management;

(2) Create by rule a formal system for inmate classification. This classification system shall consider:

(a) Public safety;

(b) Internal security and staff safety;

(c) Rehabilitative resources both within and outside the department;

(d) An assessment of each offender's risk of sexually aggressive behavior as provided in RCW 13.40.470; and

(e) An assessment of each offender's vulnerability to sexually aggressive behavior as provided in RCW 13.40.470;

(3) Develop agreements with local jurisdictions to develop regional facilities with a variety of custody levels;

(4) Adopt rules establishing effective disciplinary policies to maintain order within institutions;

(5) Develop a comprehensive diagnostic evaluation process to be used at intake, including but not limited to evaluation for substance addiction or abuse, literacy, learning disabilities, fetal alcohol syndrome or effect, attention deficit disorder, and mental health;

(6) Develop placement criteria:

(a) To avoid assigning youth who present a moderate or high risk of sexually aggressive behavior to the same sleeping quarters as youth assessed as vulnerable to sexual victimization under RCW 13.40.470(1)(c); and

(b) To avoid placing a juvenile offender on parole status who has been assessed as a moderate to high risk for sexually aggressive behavior in a department community residential program with another child who is: (i) Dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW, or an at-risk youth or child in need of services under chapter 13.32A RCW; and (ii) not also a juvenile offender on parole status;

(7) Develop a plan to implement, by July 1, 1995:

(a) Substance abuse treatment programs for all state juvenile rehabilitation facilities and institutions;

(b) Vocational education and instruction programs at all state juvenile rehabilitation facilities and institutions; and

(c) An educational program to establish self-worth and responsibility in juvenile offenders. This educational program shall emphasize instruction in character-building principles such as: Respect for self, others, and authority; victim awareness; accountability; work ethics; good citizenship; and life skills; and

(8)(a) The department shall develop uniform policies related to custodial assaults consistent with RCW 72.01.045 and 9A.36.100 that are to be followed in all juvenile rehabilitation facilities; and

(b) The department will report assaults in accordance with the policies developed in (a) of this subsection.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 616; 2003 c 229 s 1; 1999 c 372 s 2; 1997 c 386 s 54; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 516.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Implementation deadline—1997 c 386 s 54: "The policy developed under RCW 13.40.460(6)(b) shall be implemented within the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the division of children and family services by July 1, 1998." [ 1997 c 386 s 55.]

Finding—Intent—1997 c 386 ss 50-55: See note following RCW 13.40.470.

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.